Hawaii statutes.
§91-3 Procedure for adoption, amendment, or
repeal of rules. (a) Except as provided in subsection (f), prior to the
adoption of any rule authorized by law, or the amendment or repeal thereof, the
adopting agency shall:

(1) Give at least thirty days' notice for a public
hearing. The notice shall include:

(A) A statement of the topic of the proposed
rule adoption, amendment, or repeal or a general description of the subjects
involved; and

(B) A statement that a copy of the proposed
rule to be adopted, the proposed rule amendment, or the rule proposed to be
repealed will be mailed to any interested person who requests a copy, pays the
required fees for the copy and the postage, if any, together with a description
of where and how the requests may be made;

(C) A statement of when, where, and during
what times the proposed rule to be adopted, the proposed rule amendment, or the
rule proposed to be repealed may be reviewed in person; and

(D) The date, time, and place where the
public hearing will be held and where interested persons may be heard on the
proposed rule adoption, amendment, or repeal.

The notice shall be mailed to all persons
who have made a timely written request of the agency for advance notice of its
rulemaking proceedings, given at least once statewide for state agencies and in
the county for county agencies. Proposed state agency rules shall also be
posted on the Internet as provided in section 91-2.6; and

(2) Afford all interested persons opportunity to
submit data, views, or arguments, orally or in writing. The agency shall fully
consider all written and oral submissions respecting the proposed rule. The
agency may make its decision at the public hearing or announce then the date
when it intends to make its decision. Upon adoption, amendment, or repeal of a
rule, the agency, if requested to do so by an interested person, shall issue a
concise statement of the principal reasons for and against its determination.

(b) Notwithstanding the foregoing, if an
agency finds that an imminent peril to the public health, safety, or morals, to
livestock and poultry health, or to natural resources requires adoption,
amendment, or repeal of a rule upon less than thirty days' notice of hearing,
and states in writing its reasons for such finding, it may proceed without
prior notice or hearing or upon such abbreviated notice and hearing, including
posting the abbreviated notice and hearing on the Internet as provided in
section 91-2.6, as it finds practicable to adopt an emergency rule to be effective
for a period of not longer than one hundred twenty days without renewal.

(c) The adoption, amendment, or repeal of any
rule by any state agency shall be subject to the approval of the governor. The
adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule by any county agency shall be
subject to the approval of the mayor of the county. This subsection shall not
apply to the adoption, amendment, and repeal of the rules of the county boards
of water supply.

(d) The requirements of subsection (a) may be
waived by the governor in the case of the State, or by the mayor in the case of
a county, whenever a state or county agency is required by federal provisions
to adopt rules as a condition to receiving federal funds and the agency is
allowed no discretion in interpreting the federal provisions as to the rules
required to be adopted; provided that the agency shall make the adoption,
amendment, or repeal known to the public by:

(1) Giving public notice of the substance of the
proposed rule at least once statewide prior to the waiver of the governor or
the mayor; and

(2) Posting the full text of the proposed rulemaking
action on the Internet as provided in section 91-2.6.

(e) No adoption, amendment, or repeal of any
rule shall be invalidated solely because of:

(1) The inadvertent failure to mail an advance notice
of rulemaking proceedings;

(2) The inadvertent failure to mail or the nonreceipt
of requested copies of the proposed rule to be adopted, the proposed rule
amendment, or the rule proposed to be repealed; or

(3) The inadvertent failure on the part of a state
agency to post on the website of the office of the lieutenant governor all
proposed rulemaking actions of the agency and the full text of the agency's
proposed rules as provided in section 91-2.6.

Any challenge to the validity of the adoption,
amendment, or repeal of an administrative rule on the ground of noncompliance
with statutory procedural requirements shall be forever barred unless the
challenge is made in a proceeding or action, including an action pursuant to
section 91-7, that is begun within three years after the effective date of the
adoption, amendment, or repeal of the rule.

(f) Whenever an agency seeks only to repeal
one or more sections, chapters, or subchapters of the agency's rules because
the rules are either null and void or unnecessary, and not adopt, amend, or
compile any other rules:

(1) The agency shall give thirty days' public notice
at least once statewide of the proposed date of repeal and of:

(A) A list of the sections, chapters, or
subchapters, as applicable, being repealed; and

(B) A statement of when, where, and during
what times the sections, chapters, or subchapters proposed to be repealed may
be reviewed in person;

(2) The agency shall post the full text of the proposed
sections, chapters, or subchapters to be repealed on the Internet as provided
in section 91-2.6; and

(3) Any interested person may petition the agency
regarding the sections, chapters, or subchapters proposed to be repealed,
pursuant to section 91-6.

This subsection does not apply to the repeal of
one or more subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, clauses, words, phrases, or
other material within a section that does not constitute the entire section to
be repealed. [L 1961, c 103, §3; am L 1965, c 96, §139a; Supp, §6C-3; HRS
§91-3; am L 1973, c 13, §1; am L 1979, c 64, §1; am L 1985, c 68, §2; am L
1989, c 64, §2; am L 1998, c 2, §§27, 28; am L 1999, c 301, §2(2); am L 2000, c
283, §6; am L 2012, c 149, §2]

Cross References

Additional requirements for publication of notice of public
hearings, see §92-41.

Attorney General Opinions

The "General Requirements and Covenants" of public
works contracts are rules as defined by section 91-1 and any amendments require
notice and a public hearing. Att. Gen. Op. 66-10.

Section is limited to rules having the force and effect of
law; AG Opinion 66-10 superseded. Att. Gen. Op. 72-5.

State agency required by subsection (a)(1) to publish notice
of hearing must in addition comply with publication requirements of section
92-41. Att. Gen. Op. 73-12.

Board cannot adopt "policy" which would have the
effect of amending a rule, without following HAPA requirements. Att. Gen. Op.
81-11.

Notices are not required to be in the legal section of a
newspaper. Att. Gen. Op. 89-4.

Substantial changes in proposed rules made after public
hearing require additional hearing where material is included on subject not
covered in original notice or change was not advocated or discussed at original
hearing. Att. Gen. Op. 91-05.

For the repeal of rules, this section and §92-41 did not
require individual notice to all property owners potentially affected by the
change in the rules but only notice by publication, and a mailing to those
persons who requested advance notice of department's rulemaking proceedings.
Att. Gen. Op. 97-4.

Case Notes

Where defendant did not give notice and hold public hearing
pursuant to subsection (a) before issuing approval of use of wood preservative,
defendant's approval, together with defendant's conditions of approval, would
appear to be rulemaking. 939 F. Supp. 746.

Changes may be made in a rule between the original proposed
and presented at a public hearing and as finally adopted. Substantial change
in a rule after a public hearing may require another public hearing. 50 H.
156, 434 P.2d 516.

Notice should fairly apprise interested parties of what is
being proposed so they can formulate and present rational responses to the
proposal. 64 H. 389, 642 P.2d 530.

"Substance" of proposed rules defined. 64 H. 389,
642 P.2d 530.

Rule enabling insurance commissioner to prescribe
endorsements did not give carte blanche authority to sidestep the independent
requirements of chapter 91. 67 H. 148, 682 P.2d 73.

Adoption by reference of future amendments unlawful. 67 H.
451, 691 P.2d 365.

No waiver of notice and hearing requirements allowed where
agency had discretion to interpret federal provisions as to required rules. 68
H. 80, 705 P.2d 17.

Inadequate notice, discussed. 70 H. 135, 764 P.2d 1233.

Department provided adequate notice under this chapter of its
intent to hold public hearings on proposed amendments to its administrative
rules; nothing in chapter or case law requires that notice of public hearings
on proposed amendments be published only after the effective date of the
statute authorizing such amendments. 88 H. 307, 966 P.2d 619.

Where city appraiser's unwritten methodology for determining
imparted value fell within definition of a rule for purposes of §91-1(4), city
needed to follow rulemaking procedures set forth in this section prior to
applying imparted value deductions toward golf course assessments. 89 H. 381,
974 P.2d 21.

The board of land and natural resources was not required to
engage in rule-making to adopt a standardized methodology for valuation of
damages to conservation lands before making a valuation of damage to land in
the conservation district resulting from excessive sedimentation. 132 H. 247,
320 P.3d 912 (2014).

Notice of public hearing met all requirements of this
section; no merit to points on appeal that court erroneously dismissed claims
that proposed hearing room was too small and that separate hearings should be
held on neighbor islands. 10 H. App. 210, 863 P.2d 344.

Sections 183D-22 and 183D-10.5 provided the authority for the
department of land and natural resources to require payment of a fee for a
hunting-related article such as a stamp; however, since game bird hunting was
an activity permitted under chapter 183D, the department was required under
§183D-3 to adopt a rule pursuant to this section when setting the stamp fees
for hunting. 117 H. 16 (App.), 175 P.3d 126.

Since the addition of two extra hunting days to each week of
the hunting season concerned "conditions for entry into game management
areas, and public hunting areas designated by the department of land and
natural resources" and "open seasons" for hunting, the express
language of §183D-3 mandated that in order to add the two weekdays for bird
hunting, the department had to amend Hawaii administrative rule 13-122-4
pursuant to chapter 91. 117 H. 16 (App.), 175 P.3d 126.

Cited: 715 F. Supp. 2d 1115.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next